test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-i_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - jävri: # ok AIGI i/á 
    jävri+N+Sg+Nom:   jävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Gen:   jäävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Acc:   jäävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Ill:   jáávrán # TWLC: ä > á; 2. st. i > á ovddabealde (dát guokte dušše ill.)
    jävri+N+Sg+Loc:   jäävrist
    jävri+N+Sg+Com:   javrijn
    jävri+N+Sg+Abe:   jäˊvrittáá
    jävri+N+Ess:      jävˊrin
    jävri+N+Par:      jävrid
    jävri+N+Pl+Nom:   jäävrih
    jävri+N+Pl+Gen:  [jaavrij, jaˊvrij]
    jävri+N+Pl+Acc:   jaavrijd
    jävri+N+Pl+Ill:   javrijd
    jävri+N+Pl+Loc:   jaavrijn
    jävri+N+Pl+Com:   jaˊvrijguin
    jävri+N+Pl+Abe:   jaˊvrijttáá

  Noun - täsni: # ok AIGI i/á
    täsni+N+Sg+Nom:   täsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Gen:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Acc:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Ill:   táásnán
    täsni+N+Sg+Loc:   tääsnist
    täsni+N+Sg+Com:   tasnijn
    täsni+N+Sg+Abe:   täˊsnittáá
    täsni+N+Ess:      täsnin
    täsni+N+Par:      täsnid
    täsni+N+Pl+Nom:   tääsnih
    täsni+N+Pl+Gen:  [taasnij, taˊsnij]
    täsni+N+Pl+Acc:   taasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Ill:   tasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Loc:   taasnijn
    täsni+N+Pl+Com:   taˊsnijguin
    täsni+N+Pl+Abe:   taˊsnijttáá

  Noun - njälmi: # ok AIGI i/á
    njälmi+N+Sg+Nom:   njälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Gen:   njäälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Acc:   njäälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Ill:   njáálmán
    njälmi+N+Sg+Loc:   njäälmist
    njälmi+N+Sg+Com:   njalmijn
    njälmi+N+Sg+Abe:   njäˊlmittáá
    njälmi+N+Ess:      njälmin
    njälmi+N+Pl+Nom:   njäälmih
    njälmi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaalmij, njaˊlmij]
    njälmi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaalmijd
    njälmi+N+Pl+Ill:   njalmijd
    njälmi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaalmijn
    njälmi+N+Pl+Com:   njaˊlmijguin
    njälmi+N+Pl+Abe:   njaˊlmijttáá

  Noun - lähji: # ok AIGI i/á
    lähji+N+Sg+Nom:   lähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Gen:   läähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Acc:   läähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Ill:   lááhján
    lähji+N+Sg+Loc:   läähjist
    lähji+N+Sg+Com:   lahjijn
    lähji+N+Sg+Abe:   läˊhjittáá
    lähji+N+Ess:      lähjin
    lähji+N+Ess:      lähjid
    lähji+N+Pl+Nom:   läähjih
    lähji+N+Pl+Gen:  [laahjij, laˊhjij]
    lähji+N+Pl+Acc:   laahjijd
    lähji+N+Pl+Ill:   lahjijd
    lähji+N+Pl+Loc:   laahjijn
    lähji+N+Pl+Com:   laˊhjijguin
    lähji+N+Pl+Abe:   laˊhjijttáá

  Noun - säppi: # ok AIGI i/á
    säppi+N+Sg+Nom:   säppi
    säppi+N+Sg+Gen:   sääpi
    säppi+N+Sg+Acc:   sääpi
    säppi+N+Sg+Ill:   sáápán
    säppi+N+Sg+Loc:   sääpist
    säppi+N+Sg+Com:   sappijn
    säppi+N+Sg+Abe:   säˊpittáá
    säppi+N+Ess:      säppin
    säppi+N+Par:      säppid
    säppi+N+Pl+Nom:   sääpih
    säppi+N+Pl+Gen:  [saapij, saˊpij]
    säppi+N+Pl+Acc:   saapijd
    säppi+N+Pl+Ill:   sappijd
    säppi+N+Pl+Loc:   saapijn
    säppi+N+Pl+Com:   saˊpijguin
    säppi+N+Pl+Abe:   saˊpijttáá

  Noun - välli: # ok AIGI i/á
    välli+N+Sg+Nom:   välli
    välli+N+Sg+Gen:   vääḷi
    välli+N+Sg+Acc:   vääḷi
    välli+N+Sg+Ill:   vááḷán
    välli+N+Sg+Loc:   vääḷist
    välli+N+Sg+Com:   vallijn
    välli+N+Sg+Abe:   väˊḷittáá
    välli+N+Ess:      vällin
    välli+N+Par:      vällid
    välli+N+Pl+Nom:   vääḷih
    välli+N+Pl+Gen:  [vaaḷij, vaˊlij]
    välli+N+Pl+Acc:   vaaḷijd
    välli+N+Pl+Ill:   vallijd
    välli+N+Pl+Loc:   vaaḷijn
    välli+N+Pl+Com:   vaˊḷijguin
    välli+N+Pl+Abe:   vaˊḷijttáá

  Noun - päddi: # ok AIGI i/á
    päddi+N+Sg+Nom:   päddi
    päddi+N+Sg+Gen:   päädi
    päddi+N+Sg+Acc:   päädi
    päddi+N+Sg+Ill:   páádán
    päddi+N+Sg+Loc:   päädist
    päddi+N+Sg+Com:   paddijn
    päddi+N+Sg+Abe:   päˊdittáá
    päddi+N+Ess:      päddin
    päddi+N+Par:      päddid
    päddi+N+Pl+Nom:   päädih
    päddi+N+Pl+Gen:  [paadij, paˊdij]
    päddi+N+Pl+Acc:   paadijd
    päddi+N+Pl+Ill:   paddijd
    päddi+N+Pl+Loc:   paadijn
    päddi+N+Pl+Com:   paˊdijguin
    päddi+N+Pl+Abe:   paˊdijttáá

  Noun - päkki: # ok AIGI WG i/á
    päkki+N+Sg+Nom:   päkki
    päkki+N+Sg+Gen:   päähi
    päkki+N+Sg+Acc:   päähi
    päkki+N+Sg+Ill:   páákán
    päkki+N+Sg+Loc:   päähist
    päkki+N+Sg+Com:   pahhijn
    päkki+N+Sg+Abe:   päˊhittáá
    päkki+N+Ess:      päkkin
    päkki+N+Par:      päkkid
    päkki+N+Pl+Nom:   päähih
    päkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [paahij, paˊhij]
    päkki+N+Pl+Acc:   paahijd
    päkki+N+Pl+Ill:   pahhijd
    päkki+N+Pl+Loc:   paahijn
    päkki+N+Pl+Com:   paˊhijguin
    päkki+N+Pl+Abe:   paˊhijttáá

  Noun - mätki: # ok AIGI i/á
    mätki+N+Sg+Nom:   mätki
    mätki+N+Sg+Gen:   määđhi
    mätki+N+Sg+Acc:   määđhi
    mätki+N+Sg+Ill:   máátkán
    mätki+N+Sg+Loc:   määđhist
    mätki+N+Sg+Com:   mađhijn
    mätki+N+Sg+Abe:   mäˊđhittáá
    mätki+N+Ess:      mätkin
    mätki+N+Par:      mätkid
    mätki+N+Pl+Nom:   määđhih
    mätki+N+Pl+Gen:  [maađhij, maˊđhij]
    mätki+N+Pl+Acc:   maađhijd
    mätki+N+Pl+Ill:   mađhijd
    mätki+N+Pl+Loc:   maađhijn
    mätki+N+Pl+Com:   maˊđhijguin
    mätki+N+Pl+Abe:   maˊđhijttáá

  Noun - pähti: # ok AIGI i/á 
    pähti+N+Sg+Nom:   pähti
    pähti+N+Sg+Gen:   päävti
    pähti+N+Sg+Acc:   päävti
    pähti+N+Sg+Ill:   pááhtán
    pähti+N+Sg+Loc:   päävtist
    pähti+N+Sg+Com:   pavttijn
    pähti+N+Sg+Abe:   päˊvtittáá
    pähti+N+Ess:      pähtin
    pähti+N+Par:      pähtid
    pähti+N+Pl+Nom:   päävtih
    pähti+N+Pl+Gen:  [paavtij, paˊvtij]
    pähti+N+Pl+Acc:   paavtijd
    pähti+N+Pl+Ill:   pavttijd
    pähti+N+Pl+Loc:   paavtijn
    pähti+N+Pl+Com:   paˊvtijguin
    pähti+N+Pl+Abe:   paˊvtijttáá
  
  Noun - tähti: # ok AIGI i/á
    tähti+N+Sg+Nom:   tähti
    tähti+N+Sg+Gen:   täävti
    tähti+N+Sg+Acc:   täävti
    tähti+N+Sg+Ill:   tááhtán
    tähti+N+Sg+Loc:   täävtist
    tähti+N+Sg+Com:   tavttijn
    tähti+N+Sg+Abe:   täˊvtittáá
    tähti+N+Ess:      tähˊtin
    tähti+N+Par:      tähˊtid
    tähti+N+Pl+Nom:   täävtih
    tähti+N+Pl+Gen:  [taavtij, taˊvtij]
    tähti+N+Pl+Acc:   taavtijd
    tähti+N+Pl+Ill:   tavttijd
    tähti+N+Pl+Loc:   taavtijn
    tähti+N+Pl+Com:   taˊvtijguin
    tähti+N+Pl+Abe:   taˊvtijttáá

  Noun - mecci: # ok AIGI i / á
    mecci+N+Sg+Nom:   mecci
    mecci+N+Sg+Gen:   meeci
    mecci+N+Sg+Gen:   meeci
    mecci+N+Sg+Ill:   miäcán # TWOLC: e > iä (Sg Ill)
    mecci+N+Sg+Loc:   meecist
    mecci+N+Sg+Com:   meccijn
    mecci+N+Sg+Abe:   meˊcittáá
    mecci+N+Ess:      meccin
    mecci+N+Par:      meccid
    mecci+N+Pl+Nom:   meecih
    mecci+N+Pl+Gen:  [meecij, meˊcij]
    mecci+N+Pl+Acc:   meecijd
    mecci+N+Pl+Ill:   meccijd
    mecci+N+Pl+Loc:   meecijn
    mecci+N+Pl+Com:   meˊcijguin
    mecci+N+Pl+Abe:   meˊcijttáá

  Noun - leibi: # ok AIGI
    leibi+N+Sg+Nom:   leibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Gen:   leeibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Acc:   leeibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Ill:   liäibán
    leibi+N+Sg+Loc:   leeibist
    leibi+N+Sg+Com:   leibijn
    leibi+N+Sg+Abe:   leˊibittáá
    leibi+N+Ess:      leibin
    leibi+N+Par:      leibid
    leibi+N+Pl+Nom:   leeibih
    leibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [leeibij, leˊibij]
    leibi+N+Pl+Acc:   leeibijd
    leibi+N+Pl+Ill:   leibijd
    leibi+N+Pl+Loc:   leeibijn
    leibi+N+Pl+Com:   leˊibijguin
    leibi+N+Pl+Abe:   leˊibijttáá

  Noun - seibi: # ok AIGI
    seibi+N+Sg+Nom:   seibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Gen:   seeibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Acc:   seeibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Ill:   siäibán
    seibi+N+Sg+Loc:   seeibist
    seibi+N+Sg+Com:   seibijn
    seibi+N+Sg+Abe:   seˊibittáá
    seibi+N+Ess:      seibin
    seibi+N+Par:      seibin
    seibi+N+Pl+Nom:   seeibih
    seibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [seeibij, seˊibij]
    seibi+N+Pl+Acc:   seeibijd
    seibi+N+Pl+Ill:   seibijd
    seibi+N+Pl+Loc:   seeibijn
    seibi+N+Pl+Com:   seˊibijguin
    seibi+N+Pl+Abe:   seˊibijttáá

  Noun - veigi: # ok AIGI
    veigi+N+Sg+Nom:   veigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Gen:   veeigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Acc:   veeigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Ill:   viäigán
    veigi+N+Sg+Loc:   veeigist
    veigi+N+Sg+Com:   veigijn
    veigi+N+Sg+Abe:   veˊigittáá
    veigi+N+Ess:      veigin
    veigi+N+Par:      veigid
    veigi+N+Pl+Nom:   veeigih
    veigi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veeigij, veˊigij]
    veigi+N+Pl+Acc:   veeigijd
    veigi+N+Pl+Ill:   veigijd
    veigi+N+Pl+Loc:   veeigijn
    veigi+N+Pl+Com:   veˊigijguin
    veigi+N+Pl+Abe:   veˊigijttáá

  Noun - sieidi: # ok AIGI
    sieidi+N+Sg+Nom:   sieiˊdi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Gen:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Acc:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Ill:   siäidán
    sieidi+N+Sg+Loc:   sieidist
    sieidi+N+Sg+Com:   sieiˊdijn
    sieidi+N+Sg+Abe:   sieˊidittáá
    sieidi+N+Ess:      sieiˊdin
    sieidi+N+Par:      sieiˊdid
    sieidi+N+Pl+Nom:   sieidih
    sieidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [sieidij, sieˊidij]
    sieidi+N+Pl+Acc:   sieidijd
    sieidi+N+Pl+Ill:   sieiˊdijd
    sieidi+N+Pl+Loc:   sieidijn
    sieidi+N+Pl+Com:   sieˊidijguin
    sieidi+N+Pl+Abe:   sieˊidijttáá

  Noun - pyeidi: # ok AIGI
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Nom:   pyeiˊdi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Gen:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Acc:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Ill:   puáidán
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Loc:   pyeidist
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Com:   puoiˊdijn
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Abe:   pyeˊidittáá
    pyeidi+N+Ess:      pyeiˊdin
    pyeidi+N+Par:      pyeiˊdid
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Nom:   pyeidih
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [puoidij, puoˊidij]
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Acc:   puoidijd
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Ill:   puoiˊdijd
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Loc:   puoidijn
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Com:   puoˊidijguin
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Abe:   puoˊidijttáá

  Noun - kyeimi: # ok AIGI
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Nom:   kyeiˊmi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Gen:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Acc:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Ill:   kuáimán
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Loc:   kyeimist
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Com:   kuoiˊmijn
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Abe:   kyeˊimittáá
    kyeimi+N+Ess:      kyeiˊmin
    kyeimi+N+Par:      kyeiˊmin
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Nom:   kyeimih
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuoimij, kuoˊimij]
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Acc:   kuoimijd
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Ill:   kuoiˊmijd
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Loc:   kuoimijn
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Com:   kuoˊimijguin
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Abe:   kuoˊimijttáá

  Noun - syeini: # ok AIGI
    syeini+N+Sg+Nom:   syeiˊni
    syeini+N+Sg+Gen:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Acc:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Ill:   suáinán
    syeini+N+Sg+Loc:   syeinist
    syeini+N+Sg+Com:   suoiˊnijn
    syeini+N+Sg+Abe:   syeˊinittáá
    syeini+N+Ess:      syeiˊnin
    syeini+N+Par:      syeiˊnid
    syeini+N+Pl+Nom:   syeinih
    syeini+N+Pl+Gen:  [suoinij, suoˊinij]
    syeini+N+Pl+Acc:   suoinijd
    syeini+N+Pl+Ill:   suoiˊnijd
    syeini+N+Pl+Loc:   suoinijn
    syeini+N+Pl+Com:   suoˊinijguin
    syeini+N+Pl+Abe:   suoˊinijttáá

  Noun - nuáidi: # ok AIGI
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Nom:   nuáiˊdi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Gen:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Acc:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Ill:   nuáidán
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Loc:   nuáidist
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Com:   noidijn
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Abe:   nuáˊidittáá
    nuáidi+N+Ess:      nuáiˊdin
    nuáidi+N+Par:      nuáiˊdid
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Nom:   nuáidih
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [nooidij, noˊidij]
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Acc:   nooidijd
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Ill:   noidijd
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Loc:   nooidijn
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Com:   noˊidijguin
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Abe:   noˊidijttáá

  Noun - käibi: # ok AIGI
    käibi+N+Sg+Nom:   käibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Gen:   kääibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Acc:   kääibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Ill:   kááibán
    käibi+N+Sg+Loc:   kääibist
    käibi+N+Sg+Com:   kaibijn
    käibi+N+Sg+Abe:   käˊibittáá
    käibi+N+Ess:      käibin
    käibi+N+Par:      käibid
    käibi+N+Pl+Nom:   kääibih
    käibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kaaibij, kaˊibij]
    käibi+N+Pl+Acc:   kaaibijd
    käibi+N+Pl+Ill:   kaibijd
    käibi+N+Pl+Loc:   kaaibijn
    käibi+N+Pl+Com:   kaˊibijguin
    käibi+N+Pl+Abe:   kaˊibijttáá
